Mississippi, session 2026, HB567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A candidate, political committee, political party or conduit, as defined in subsection (5), may not accept any contribution made with a credit card via the Internet unless: (a)  At the time of making the contribution, the person making the contribution provides the credit card verification value or code to the candidate, political committee, political party or conduit; and (b)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the billing address associated with the credit card is located in the United States. (2)  If a contribution under subsection (1) of this section is made by a United States citizen living outside of the United States and the billing address associated with the credit card is not located in the United States, the person making the contribution shall provide to the candidate, political committee, political party or conduit, at the time of making the contribution, the mailing address of the location in the United States that the person, if registered to vote in the United States, uses for voter registration purposes. (3)  Each candidate, political committee, political party or conduit shall maintain a record of the names and addresses of each person making a contribution under this section for purposes of making any disclosure report required by Sections 23-15-801 through 23-15-821. (4)  A financial institution that processes credit card contributions via the Internet to a candidate, political committee, political party or conduit without requiring the credit card verification value or code and a billing address located in the United States may be subject to a forfeiture in an amount equal to the cumulative amount of such contributions. (5)  As used in this section, "conduit" means a person who receives a contribution of money from a contributor on behalf of  a candidate, political committee or political party, deposits the contribution in an account held by that person, and releases the contribution to a candidate, political committee or political party at the direction of the contributor. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-807, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-807.  (a)  Each candidate or political committee shall file reports of contributions and disbursements in accordance with the provisions of this section.  All candidates or political committees required to report such contributions and disbursements may terminate the obligation to report only upon submitting a final report that contributions will no longer be received or disbursements made and that the candidate or committee has no outstanding debts or obligations.  The candidate, treasurer or chief executive officer shall sign the report. (b)  Candidates seeking election, or nomination for election, and political committees making expenditures to influence or attempt to influence voters for or against the nomination for election of one or more candidates or balloted measures at such election, shall file the following reports: (i)  In any calendar year during which there is a regularly scheduled election, a pre-election report shall be filed no later than the seventh day before any election in which the candidate or political committee has accepted contributions or made expenditures and shall be completed as of the tenth day before the election; (ii)  In 1987 and every fourth year thereafter, periodic reports shall be filed no later than the tenth day after April 30, May 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31, and shall be completed as of the last day of each period; (iii)  In any calendar years except 1987 and except every fourth year thereafter, a report covering the calendar year shall be filed no later than January 31 of the following calendar year; and (iv)  Except as otherwise provided in the requirements of paragraph (i) of this subsection (b), unopposed candidates are not required to file pre-election reports but must file all other reports required by paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection (b). (c)  All candidates for judicial office as defined in Section 23-15-975, or their political committees, shall file periodic reports in the year in which they are to be elected no later than the tenth day after April 30, May 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31.  Candidates for judicial office shall not be required to file an annual report during an election year, but shall file an annual report in all other years. (d)  Each report under this article shall disclose: (i)  For the reporting period and the calendar year, the total amount of all contributions and the total amount of all expenditures of the candidate or reporting committee, including those required to be identified pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection (d) as well as the total of all other contributions and expenditures during the calendar year.  The reports shall be cumulative during the calendar year to which they relate; (ii)  The identification of: 1.  Each person or political committee who makes a contribution to the reporting candidate or political committee during the reporting period, whose contribution or contributions within the calendar year have an aggregate amount or value in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) together with the date and amount of any such contribution; 2.  Each person or organization, candidate or political committee who receives an expenditure, payment or other transfer from the reporting candidate, political committee or its agent, employee, designee, contractor, consultant or other person or persons acting in its behalf during the reporting period when the expenditure, payment or other transfer to the person, organization, candidate or political committee within the calendar year have an aggregate value or amount in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) together with the date and amount of the expenditure; (iii)  The total amount of cash on hand of each reporting candidate and reporting political committee; (iv)  In addition to the contents of reports specified in paragraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) of this subsection (d), each political party shall disclose: 1.  Each person or political committee who makes a contribution to a political party during the reporting period and whose contribution or contributions to a political party within the calendar year have an aggregate amount or value in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), together with the date and amount of the contribution; 2.  Each person or organization who receives an expenditure or expenditures by a political party during the reporting period when the expenditure or expenditures to the person or organization within the calendar year have an aggregate value or amount in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), together with the date and amount of the expenditure; (v)  Disclosure required under this section of an expenditure to a credit card issuer, financial institution or business allowing payments and money transfers to be made over the Internet must include, by way of detail or separate entry, the amount of funds passing to each person, business entity or organization receiving funds from the expenditure. (e)  The appropriate office specified in Section 23-15-805 must be in actual receipt of the reports specified in this article by 5:00 p.m. on the dates specified in subsection (b) of this section.  If the date specified in subsection (b) of this section shall fall on a weekend or legal holiday then the report shall be due in the appropriate office at 5:00 p.m. on the first working day before the date specified in subsection (b) of this section.  The reporting candidate or reporting political committee shall ensure that the reports are delivered to the appropriate office by the filing deadline.  The Secretary of State may approve specific means of electronic transmission of completed campaign finance disclosure reports, which may include, but not be limited to, transmission by electronic facsimile (FAX) devices. (f)  (i)  If any contribution of more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) is received by a candidate or candidate's political committee after the tenth day, but more than forty-eight (48) hours before 12:01 a.m. of the day of the election, the candidate or political committee shall notify the appropriate office designated in Section 23-15-805, within forty-eight (48) hours of receipt of the contribution. The notification shall include: 1.  The name of the receiving candidate; 2.  The name of the receiving candidate's political committee, if any; 3.  The office sought by the candidate; 4.  The identification of the contributor; 5.  The date of receipt; 6.  The amount of the contribution; 7.  If the contribution is in-kind, a description of the in-kind contribution; and 8.  The signature of the candidate or the treasurer or chair of the candidate's political organization. (ii)  The notification shall be in writing, and may be transmitted by overnight mail, courier service, or other reliable means, including electronic facsimile (FAX), but the candidate or candidate's committee shall ensure that the notification shall in fact be received in the appropriate office designated in Section 23-15-805 within forty-eight (48) hours of the contribution. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-819, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-819.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for a foreign national, directly or through any other person, to make any contribution or any expenditure of money or other thing of value, or to promise expressly or impliedly to make any such contribution or expenditure, in connection with an election to any political office or in connection with any primary election, convention or caucus held to select candidates for any political office. (2)  No person shall solicit, accept or receive any such contribution from a foreign national. (3)  The term "foreign national" means: (a)  A foreign national as defined in 22 USCS 611(b), except that the terms "foreign national" does not include any individual who is a citizen of the United States; or (b)  An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence. SECTION 4.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Article 23, Chapter 23 of the Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.